Louisiana, session 2026, SB321.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 328(C) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 328. Bail undertaking
* * *
C.(1) An electronic bond may shall only be executed in a parish where the
sheriff has electronic bond software in place. Agents Only agents may be approved
by the sheriff to shall execute an electronic bond. A licensed bail bond producer
applying for electronic bond authority may shall make an application to the sheriff
and shall be domiciled and maintain a principal place of business in this state and
possess a Louisiana bail bond producer license for at least three years preceding the
date of application.
(2) The approving sheriff authority may require any documents deemed
necessary to verify the information contained in the application and may establish
additional requirements for approval of electronic bond authority within the
parish, including but not limited to geographic limitations, proof of local
domicile or principal place of business within the parish, geofencing
parameters, or other requirements that the sheriff deems appropriate for the
administration of electronic bonds within the parish.
(3) Any parish that elects to implement electronic bonds shall allow both
in-person and electronic methods of posting bail bonds.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 321 ENROLLED
(4)(a) The electronic bond provider shall maintain a registry of agents
approved by each participating parish sheriff to execute electronic bonds within
that parish.
(b) Prior to permitting the execution of any electronic bond, the provider
shall verify that the agent seeking to post the bond is listed in the approved
agent registry for the parish in which the bond is to be posted. The provider
shall deny electronic bond access to any agent who does not appear in the
applicable registry.
(c) The sheriff shall provide the electronic bond provider with timely
notice of any additions to or removals from the approved registry.
(5) When an electronic bond is used, all of the following procedures shall
be followed:
(a) The electronic bond provider shall implement multi-factor
authentication for each individual bond posting transaction, which shall include
at a minimum both of the following:
(i) Facial recognition liveness verification linked to the identity of the
approved licensed agent executing the bond.
(ii) A secondary authentication factor independent of the agent's account
login credentials.
(b) The electronic bond provider shall ensure that the authentication
required by Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph is performed personally by the
approved agent of record at the time of each individual bond posting. The
provider shall not permit the use of shared login credentials, shared
authentication devices or factors, or proxy authentication by any person other
than the approved agent of record.
(c) The approving sheriff may, as a condition of authorizing electronic
bond posting within the parish, require the electronic bond provider to
incorporate a geographic restriction, including a geofence, limiting electronic
bond posting to a defined geographic area within or proximate to the parish.
(d) The electronic bond provider shall offer automated clearing house
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 321 ENROLLED
(ACH) electronic funds transfer as a method of payment for fees associated with
the posting of an electronic bond.
Section 2. R.S. 22:822(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§822. Criminal bail bond annual license fee
A.(1) On premiums for all commercial surety underwriters who write
criminal bail bonds in the state of Louisiana, there shall be a fee equal to two dollars
for each one hundred dollars worth of liability underwritten by the commercial
surety. Except as authorized under the provisions of R.S. 13:718(I)(2), this shall be
the exclusive fee or tax on any criminal bail bond premium, including thereto
premium taxes owed. In furtherance of the payment of this premium fee all
commercial surety underwriters underwriting criminal bail bonds in the state of
Louisiana shall, upon submitting the appearance bond and their power of attorney,
simultaneously pay to the sheriff of the parish, a fee of two dollars for each one
hundred dollars worth of liability on the bail bond being presented for the release of
a person on bail. Failure to pay the fee shall prevent the sheriff from accepting the
appearance bond and power of attorney. The sheriff may receive the fee by check,
or cash, or automated clearing house (ACH) and shall only accept it only from the
surety or the agent of the surety.
(2)(a) When an electronic bond is posted pursuant to Code of Criminal
Procedure Article 328, the sheriff shall accept payment of the fee by ACH
electronic funds transfer, and a licensed bail bond producer may collect from
the defendant, principal, or indemnitor any fees associated with the posting of
an electronic bond that are authorized by law, including but not limited to
platform access fees, transaction fees, and ACH processing fees.
(b) The fees shall not exceed the actual cost charged to the producer by
the electronic bond provider.
(c) In the event a surety or agent of the surety presents payment of the fee by
an instrument which is returned for insufficient funds, the agent or the agent of the
surety shall be prevented from presenting the appearance bonds with their power of
attorney attached until the outstanding fees are paid to the sheriff.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 321 ENROLLED
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.